District of Columbia statutes.
34-1803.03

Additional revenues.

All revenues from the following sources shall be deposited into the Fund:

(1)

Steam (including arrearage payments) for the Correctional Treatment Facility received by the District since October 1, 2007; and

(2)

From fines paid due to automated photo enforcement in any one fiscal year:

(A)

Aggregate revenues in excess of $105,791,000 in fiscal year 2013;

(B)

Aggregate revenues in excess of $141,348,000 in fiscal year 2014;

(C)

Aggregate revenues in excess of $155,812,000 in fiscal year 2015;

(D)

Aggregate revenues in excess of $148,020,000 in fiscal year 2016; and

(E)

Aggregate revenues in excess of $140,618,000 in fiscal year 2017 and in each fiscal year thereafter.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 604c
as added Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 3042(b), 59 DCR 8025
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 3022, 60 DCR 12472
This section is referenced in § 34-1802.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 added this section.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 rewrote (2).
For temporary addition of section, see § 3042(b) of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3022 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3022 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 3021 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle C of Title III of the act may be cited as the “Automated Traffic Enforcement Enhancement Amendment Act of 2013”.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.